Illinois, session 104th, HB1983.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $2, or so much of that amount as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Office of the Executive Inspector General for the 7Secretary of State for its ordinary and contingent expenses. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92025.